Utah statutes.
58-69-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  An applicant for licensure as a dentist, except as set forth in Subsection (2), shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  provide satisfactory documentation of having successfully completed a program of professional education preparing an individual as a dentist as evidenced by having received an earned doctor's degree in dentistry from a dental school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association;

(e)  pass the National Board Dental Examinations as administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations of the American Dental Association;

(f)  pass any one of the regional dental clinical licensure examinations unless the division, in collaboration with the board, determines that:

(i)  the examination is clearly inferior to the Western Regional Examination Board; and

(ii)  reliance upon the examination poses an unjustifiable threat to public health and safety;

(g)  pass any other examinations regarding applicable law, rules, or ethics as established by division rule made in collaboration with the board;

(h)  be able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board if requested by the board; and

(i)  meet with the board if requested by the board or division for the purpose of examining the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

(2)  An applicant for licensure as a dentist qualifying under the endorsement provision of Section 58-1-302 shall:

(a)  be currently licensed in good standing in another jurisdiction set forth in Section 58-1-302;

(b) (i)  document having met all requirements for licensure under Subsection (1) except, an applicant having received licensure in another state or jurisdiction prior to the year when the National Board Dental Examinations were first administered, shall document having passed a state administered examination acceptable to the division in collaboration with the board; or

(ii)  document having obtained licensure in another state or jurisdiction upon which licensure by endorsement is based by meeting requirements which were equal to licensure requirements in Utah at the time the applicant obtained licensure in the other state or jurisdiction; and

(c)  document having been successfully engaged in practice as a dentist for not less than 6,000 hours in the five years immediately preceding the date of application for licensure.

(3)  An applicant for licensure as a dental hygienist, except as set forth in Subsection (4), shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department pursuant to Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  be a graduate holding a certificate or degree in dental hygiene from a school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association;

(e)  pass the National Board Dental Hygiene Examination as administered by the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations of the American Dental Association;

(f)  pass an examination consisting of practical demonstrations in the practice of dental hygiene and written or oral examination in the theory and practice of dental hygiene as established by division rule made in collaboration with the board;

(g)  pass any other examinations regarding applicable law, rules, and ethics as established by rule by division rule made in collaboration with the board;

(h)  be able to read, write, speak, understand, and be understood in the English language and demonstrate proficiency to the satisfaction of the board if requested by the board; and

(i)  meet with the board if requested by the board or division for the purpose of examining the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

(4)  An applicant for licensure as a dental hygienist qualifying under the endorsement provision of Section 58-1-302 shall:

(a)  be currently licensed in another jurisdiction set forth in Section 58-1-302;

(b) (i)  document having met all requirements for licensure under Subsection (3) except, an applicant having received licensure in another state or jurisdiction prior to 1962, the year when the National Board Dental Hygiene Examinations were first administered, shall document having passed a state administered examination acceptable to the division in collaboration with the board; or

(ii)  document having obtained licensure in another state or jurisdiction upon which licensure by endorsement is based by meeting requirements which were equal to licensure requirements in Utah at the time the applicant obtained licensure in the other state or jurisdiction; and

(c)  document having been successfully engaged in practice as a dental hygienist for not less than 2,000 hours in the two years immediately preceding the date of application for licensure.

